Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.043

Election.

"Election" when used alone means a general election except where the context indicates that a special election is included. "Election" when used without qualification does not include a primary.

[ 2003 c 111 s 108. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 5; 1965 c 9 s 29.01.050; prior: 1907 c 209 s 1, part; RRS s 5177(c). See also 1950 ex.s. c 14 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.01.050.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.